Hawaii statutes.
§578-8 Hearing; investigation; decree.
(a) No decree of adoption shall be entered unless a hearing has been held at
which the petitioner or petitioners, and any legal parent married to a
petitioner, and any subject of the adoption whose consent is required, have
personally appeared before the court, unless expressly excused by the court.
After considering the petition and such evidence as the petitioners and any
other properly interested person may wish to present, the court may enter a
decree of adoption if it is satisfied (1) that the individual is adoptable
under sections 578-1 and 578-2, (2) that the individual is physically,
mentally, and otherwise suitable for adoption by the petitioners, (3) that the
petitioners are fit and proper persons and financially able to give the
individual a proper home and education, if the individual is a child, and (4)
that the adoption will be for the best interests of the individual, which
decree shall take effect upon such date as may be fixed therein by the court, such
date to be not earlier than the date of the filing of the petition and not
later than six months after the date of the entry of the decree.

(b) Before entering the decree, the court
shall notify the director of human services of the pendency of such petition
for adoption and allow a reasonable time for the director to make such
investigation as the director may deem proper as to the fitness of the
petitioners to adopt the individual, however, the physical disability of the
petitioners shall not of itself be determinant of unfitness for purposes of
this section, and as to whether the best interest of the individual will be
subserved by the adoption; provided that the court may, if it finds that the
best interests of the individual to be adopted so require, by written order
waive the requirement for notification and investigation above set forth, and
enter its decree solely on the basis of the evidence adduced at the hearing.
The director shall have the right to intervene in any adoption proceeding for the
purpose of protecting the interests of the individual to be adopted or of any
legal parent of the individual, and shall have the same rights of appeal as any
party to the proceeding. The attorney general, upon the request of the
director, shall represent the director in any such proceeding. The director,
when notified as above set forth, or when the director has intervened without
notification, shall make a report to the court within the time required,
reporting the facts disclosed and the director's recommendation; provided that
the director, if the director determines that the best interests of the
individual to be adopted will be served thereby, may refer any such
notification to a child placing organization approved by the department under
section 346-17, and the report and recommendation of such organization, when
forwarded by the director, shall be considered by the court in lieu of a report
and recommendation by the director. If the court determines that any such
report discloses facts adverse to the petitioners or indicates that the best
interests of the individual to be adopted will not be subserved by the proposed
adoption, it shall thereupon give notice of the determination to the
petitioners and afford them a reasonable opportunity to rebut the report.

(c) In cases where a child is adopted from a
foreign country and is brought into the State, the court, in its discretion,
may dispense with a hearing upon receipt of a sworn affidavit, ex-parte, from
the adoptive parents requesting that the hearing be dispensed with, and upon a
finding that the issues it would have reviewed have received full consideration
by the country from which the child was adopted and the United States
Citizenship and Immigration Services. [RL 1945, pt of §12276; am L 1945, c 40,
pt of §1; am L 1953, c 115, pt of §1; RL 1955, §331-8; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1,
§20; HRS §578-8; am L 1973, c 211, §3(f); am L 1976, c 194, §1(3); am L 1979, c
65, §2; gen ch 1985; am L 1987, c 339, §4; am L 1990, c 34, §35 and c 74, §1;
am L 1995, c 37, §2; am L 2005, c 22, §41]

Cross References

Prospective adoptive parents; standards and home studies, see
§346-19.7.

Rules of Court

Decrees and orders, see Hawaii Family Court Rules, part
A(VII).

Hearings, see HFCR rule 106; intervention, see HFCR rule 24.

Case Notes

Decree of adoption not subject to collateral attack where
court had jurisdiction of parties and subject matter. 11 H. 450; 26 H. 439,
515.

Decree of adoption refused when petitioners not proper
persons to have care and custody of child. 29 H. 238.

Appeal from decree, who may. 45 H. 69, 361 P.2d 1054.

Attorney's fees may not ordinarily be awarded in absence of
statute or agreement. 56 H. 543, 544 P.2d 728.

Responsibility of department of human services discussed, where
family court erred in concluding that adoption agreement, which allowed
termination of foster board payments prior to completion of adoption process,
violated public policy. 74 H. 409, 849 P.2d 55.

Cited: 26 H. 433, 443; 32 H. 443, 445.

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next